Arkansas, session 2025, HB1254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-97-102(a)(3), concerning the definition
of "psychological examiner" relating to the practice of psychology, is
amended to read as follows:
(3) “Psychological examiner” means a person who holds himself or
herself out to be a psychological examiner or renders to individuals or to
the public for remuneration of any service involving the practice of
psychology either:
(A) Independently interviewing or administering and
interpreting tests of mental abilities, aptitudes, interests, and personality
characteristics for the purposes of psychological evaluation to assist in the
determination of diagnosis of mental health disorders or educational or
vocational selection, guidance, or placement; or
(B) Only only under the supervision of a qualified
*JMB031*
03-18-2025 14:05:08 JMB031

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 HB1254
psychologist if the service is not listed in subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this
section; and

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-97-102(a), concerning definitions
relating to the practice of psychology, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(5) "Licensed psychological practitioner" means a person who:
(A) Holds himself or herself out to be a licensed
psychological practitioner; or
(B) Renders to individuals or to the public for
remuneration of any service involving the practice of psychology
independently interviewing or administering and interpreting tests of mental
abilities, aptitudes, interests, and personality characteristics for the
purposes of psychological evaluation to assist in the determination of:
(i) Diagnosis of mental health disorders; or
(ii) Educational or vocational selection, guidance,
or placement.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-97-303 is amended to read as follows:
17-97-303. Psychological examiners — Application — Qualifications.
(a) Any A person wishing to obtain the right to practice as a
psychological examiner who has not heretofore been licensed to do so shall
make application to the Arkansas Psychology Board through the Chair of the
Arkansas Psychology Board upon a form and in the manner as shall be adopted
and prescribed by the board and shall obtain from the board a license to do
so.
(b)(1) A candidate for a license shall furnish the board with
satisfactory evidence that he or she:
(A) Has a master's degree in psychology or a closely
related field from an accredited educational institution recognized by the
board as maintaining satisfactory standards;
(B) Is competent as a psychological examiner as shown by
passing examinations, written or oral, or both, as the board deems necessary;
(C) Is not considered by the board to be engaged in
unethical practice;
(D) Has applied for a criminal background check and has
03-18-2025 14:05:08 JMB031

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 HB1254
not been found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any of the
offenses listed in § 17-3-102; and
(E) Has not failed an examination given by the board
within the preceding six (6) months.
(2) At its discretion, the board may accept satisfactory
substitute training and experience in lieu of that prescribed in subdivision
(b)(1) of this section.
(c) The board shall apply through its rules the qualifications of
supervising psychologists and the restrictions and reporting requirements of
supervision so as to implement the intent of this chapter without restricting
the professional integrity of the psychological examiner and psychologist or
the ultimate responsibility of the supervising psychologist.
(d)(1)(A) A psychological examiner licensed before December 31, 1997,
shall be granted independent practice except in neuropsychological
assessment, forensic psychological assessment, and projective personality
assessment upon the board's receiving a letter requesting independent
practice and a revised statement of intent.
(B) No additional hours of clinical supervision shall be
required for a license granted under subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section.
(2) A psychological examiner licensed after December 31, 1997,
shall be privileged to practice independently except in neuropsychological
assessment, forensic psychological assessment, and projective personality
assessment, if the person:
(A) Has completed a master's degree program in psychology;
(B) Has completed three thousand (3,000) hours of approved
clinical supervised training after making application for independent
practice; and
(C) Has filed a revised statement of intent with the board
and has provided documentation of having received appropriate training and
experience in those areas requested for independent practice.
(3) A psychological examiner licensed after December 31, 2024,
shall not be granted independent practice status if he or she submits an
application to the board for independent practice.
(d) After December 31, 2026, a new psychological examiner license
shall not be issued.

03-18-2025 14:05:08 JMB031

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 HB1254
SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 97, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
17-97-313. Licensed psychological practitioner — Application —
Qualifications — Compensation.
(a) A person wishing to practice as a licensed psychological
practitioner shall apply to the Arkansas Psychology Board through the Chair
of the Arkansas Psychology Board upon a form and in the manner as determined
by the board.
(b)(1) A candidate for a license shall furnish the board with
satisfactory evidence that he or she:
(A) Has completed:
(i) A sixty-hour master's degree in health services
psychology that is approved by the board and includes the following
coursework and training in:
(a) Discipline-specific knowledge such as
affective psychology, biological psychology, cognitive psychology,
developmental psychology, social aspects of behavior psychology,
psychometrics, and research methods;
(b) Profession-wide competencies such as
integration of science and practice, ethical and legal standards, individual
and cultural diversity, professional values and behavior, communication and
interpersonal skills, assessment, intervention, supervision, and consultation
and interprofessional skills;
(c) Eight hundred (800) hours of a practicum
or internship with a total of four hundred (400) direct client services; and
(d) At least one (1) year in a residence
program; and
(ii) Three thousand (3,000) hours of post-degree
clinical supervision approved by the board that includes:
(a) Two thousand two hundred (2,200) hours of
direct client service in the intended scope of practice;
(b) One (1) hour of supervision per ten (10)
hours of direct client service for the first one thousand (1,000) hours;
(c) One (1) hour of supervision per twenty
(20) hours of direct client service for the remaining hours; and
(d) One hundred (100) hours of didactic
03-18-2025 14:05:08 JMB031

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 HB1254
learning in the intended scope of practice per year;
(B) Is competent as a licensed psychological practitioner
as shown by passing examinations, written or oral, or both, as the board
deems necessary;
(C) Is not considered by the board to be engaged in
unethical practice;
(D) Has applied for a criminal background check and has
not been found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any of the
offenses listed in § 17-3-102; and
(E) Has not failed an examination given by the board
within the preceding six (6) months.
(2) At the board's discretion, the board may accept satisfactory
substitute training and experience in lieu of that prescribed in subdivision
(b)(1) of this section.
(3) A person who was previously licensed as a psychological
examiner and granted the privilege to practice independently by the board on
or before December 31, 2024, is not required to fulfill the requirements
under subdivision (b)(1) of this section to be licensed under this section.
(c)(1) A licensed psychological practitioner may practice
independently except in neuropsychological assessment, forensic psychological
assessment, and projective personality assessment.
(2) A licensed psychological practitioner may practice
independently in the following areas, consistent with his or her coursework,
training, and supervised experience during internship and post-degree
supervision:
(A) Providing evidence-based therapeutic interventions for
individuals, families, or groups to improve mental health and wellness;
(B) Diagnosing, treating, and managing mental and
emotional disorders or developmental and intellectual disabilities;
(C) Conducting evidence-based screening, interviewing,
testing, and assessment consistent with training of psychoeducational,
cognitive, personality characteristics, intelligence, achievement,
vocational, aptitude, and outcome management;
(D) Providing psychoeducational evaluation, planning,
therapy, and remediation services;
(E) Consulting and collaborating with other healthcare
03-18-2025 14:05:08 JMB031

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 HB1254
professionals in which the focus is on patient or family diagnoses and
treatment planning; and
(F) Supervising provisionally licensed master’s level
clinicians in the areas listed in subdivisions (c)(2)(A) - (E) of this
section.
(d) The board may issue a provisional license to a person who has
completed the requirements in subdivisions (b)(1)(A)(i) and (b)(1)(B)-(E) of
this section to ensure that the person obtains the appropriate approved post-
degree clinical supervised training as required under subdivision
(b)(1)(A)(ii) of this section.
(e) For services provided, a licensed psychological practitioner shall
receive compensation from:
(1) Medicare;
(2) The Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(3) A private insurance policy or plan;
(4) A health benefit plan; or
(5) A healthcare provider or healthcare professional.

/s/L. Johnson

















03-18-2025 14:05:08 JMB031